hr-HR: Sustav za određivanje veličine cipela: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Drugo
el: Σύστημα μεγεθών παπουτσιών: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Άλλο
zh-CN: 鞋码系统: EU; JP; Mondopoint（厘米）; UK; US; 其他
tr: Ayakkabı numaralandırma sistemi: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Diğer
it: Sistema di misurazione delle scarpe: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Altro
hu: Cipőméretezési rendszer: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Egyéb
nb: Skostørrelsessystem: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Annet
ro-RO: Sistem de mărimi pentru încălțăminte: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; SUA; Altele
de: Schuhgrößensystem: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Sonstige
pt-PT: Sistema de tamanhos de calçado: UE; JP; Mondopoint (cm); RU; EUA; Outro
en: Shoe sizing system: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Other
ko: 신발 사이즈 체계: EU; JP; 몬도포인트(cm); UK; US; 기타
da: Skostørrelsessystem: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Andet
nl: Schoen maatsysteem: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Overig
es: Sistema de tallas de calzado: UE; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Otro
sk-SK: Systém číslovania obuvi: EÚ; Jap.; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Iné
cs: Systém velikostí bot: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Jiné
sl-SI: Sistem velikosti obutve: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Drugo
vi: Hệ thống đo kích cỡ giày: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Khác
sv: Skostorlekssystem: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Övrigt
ru: Система размеров обуви: EU; JP; Mondopoint (см); UK; US; Другая
fr: Système de pointure: UE; JP; Mondopoint (cm); R.-U.; É.-U.; Autre
th: ระบบไซซ์รองเท้า: EU; JP; มอนโดพอยต์ (ซม.); UK; US; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Calçado sistema de tamanho: UE; JP; Mondopoint (cm); RU; EUA; Outros
lt-LT: Avalynės dydžių sistema: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Kita
zh-TW: 鞋子尺寸系統: 歐洲 (EU); 日本 (JP); Mondopoint (cm); 英國 (UK); 美國 (US); 其他
ja: シューズサイズ規格: EU; JP; モンドポイント (cm); UK; US; その他
fi: Kenkien kokojärjestelmä: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Muu
bg-BG: Система за оразмеряване на обувки: ЕС; JP; Mondopoint (см); UK; US; Друго
pl: System opisu rozmiaru butów: EU; JP; Mondopoint (cm); UK; US; Inne